Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 381.125, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Grant program. new text begin (a) new text end The chief geospatial information officer, through the Geospatial Advisory Council established under section 16E.30, subdivision 8, shall work with the stakeholders licensed as land surveyors under section 326.02, to develop a process for accepting applications from counties new text begin and Tribal governments new text end for funding for the perpetuation of monuments established by the United States in the public lands survey to mark public land survey corners, as provided in section 381.12, subdivision 2, clause (1). Grants may also be used to update records and data regarding monuments. new text begin (b)new text end The chief geospatial information officer must establish criteria for prioritizing applicants when resources available for grants are not sufficient to award grants to all applicants. The criteria must favor providing grants to counties that demonstrate financial need for assistancedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin and meet one or more of the following criteria:new text end new text begin (1) preserve public land survey system monuments at risk of being destroyed, lost, or obscured; new text end new text begin (2) have a low percentage of certified public land survey system monument corners; or new text end new text begin (3) demonstrate that remonumentation will support economic development in the county. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PUBLIC LAND SURVEY SYSTEM MONUMENT GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of information technology services for the public land survey system monument grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 381.125. The base for this appropriation is $10,000,000 in each of fiscal years 2027 and 2028. new text end new text begin (b) Each fiscal year, up to $350,000 of an appropriation for the public land survey system monument grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 381.125, may be used by the chief geospatial information officer for the administration of the grant program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end